North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Article 49. Poultry; Hatcheries; Chick Dealers.

§ 106-539.
National poultry improvement plan.

In order to promote the poultry industry of the State, the North Carolina Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services is hereby authorized to cooperate with the United States Department of Agriculture in the operation of the national poultry improvement plan.

History.

1945, c. 616, s. 1; 1969, c. 464; 1983, c. 290, s. 1; 1997-261, s. 109.

§ 106-540.
Rules and regulations.

The North Carolina Board of Agriculture is hereby authorized to adopt such regulations as may be necessary to:

Carry out the provisions of the national poultry improvement plan.

Set up minimum standards for the operation of hatcheries.

Regulate hatching egg dealers, chick dealers, poult dealers, poultry dealers, ratite dealers, and jobbers.

Regulate the shipping into this State of baby chicks, turkey poults and hatching eggs.

Facilitate the control and eradication of contagious and infectious diseases of poultry.

Establish fee schedules for pullorum and other disease testing, and the performance of services such as culling and selecting by Department personnel.

Provide for compulsory testing of poultry for pullorum disease and fowl typhoid.

History.

1945, c. 616, s. 2; 1969, c. 464; 1983, c. 290, ss. 2, 3; 1998-212, s. 13.10(a).

§ 106-541.
Definitions.

For the purpose of this Article, the following definitions apply:

“Hatchery” means any establishment that operates hatchery equipment for the production of baby chicks or poults.

“Hatching egg dealer, chick dealer, or jobber” means any person, firm, or corporation that buys hatching eggs, baby chicks, or turkey poults and sells or offers them for sale.

“Live poultry or ratite dealer” means a person who sells or offers for sale to the general public live poultry or ratites. Live poultry or ratite dealer does not include persons who sell on their own premises live poultry or ratites that were raised on the same premises.

“Mixed chicks” or “assorted chicks” means chicks produced from eggs from purebred females of a distinct breed mated to a purebred male of a distinct breed.

“Poultry” means live chickens, doves, ducks, geese, grouse, guinea fowl, partridges, pea fowl, pheasants, pigeons, quail, swans, or turkeys other than chicks or poults.

“Ratite” has the same meaning as in

G.S. 106-549.15

.

History.

1945, c. 616, s. 3; 1969, c. 464; 1998-212, s. 13.10(b).

§ 106-542.
Hatcheries, chick dealers and others to obtain license to operate.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm or corporation to operate a hatchery within this State without first obtaining a hatchery license from the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services for a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per year.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm or corporation to operate as a hatching egg dealer, chick dealer or jobber within this State without first obtaining a license from the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services for a fee of ten dollars ($10.00) per year.

(b1)

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation to operate as a live poultry or ratite dealer without first registering with the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.

(b2)

It shall be unlawful for a specialty market operator, as defined in

G.S. 66-250

, to knowingly and willfully permit an unregistered poultry or ratite dealer to operate on the premises of the specialty market, as defined in

G.S. 66-250

, more than 10 days after being notified in writing by the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services that the dealer is not registered.

The Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services may deny, suspend, revoke or refuse to renew the license of any person, firm or corporation for violation of this Article or any rule or regulation promulgated thereunder.

History.

1945, c. 616, s. 4; 1969, c. 464; 1983, c. 290, s. 4; 1997-261, s. 56; 1998-212, s. 13.10(c).

§ 106-543.
Requirements of National Poultry Improvement Plan must be met.

All baby chicks, turkey poults and hatching eggs sold or offered for sale shall originate in flocks that meet the requirements of the National Poultry Improvement Plan as administered by the North Carolina Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services and the regulations issued by authority of this Article for the control of pullorum disease and other infectious diseases provided that nothing in this Article shall require any hatchery to adopt the National Poultry Improvement Plan.

The Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall charge the following fees for certification in the National Poultry Improvement Plan to cover the costs of pullorum testing:

An initial certification fee of fifty dollars ($50.00), plus ten cents (10¢) per bird.

An annual recertification fee of ten dollars ($10.00), plus ten cents (10¢) per bird.

History.

1945, c. 616, s. 5; 1969, c. 464; 1983, c. 290, s. 5; 1997-261, s. 109; 2014-100, s. 13.11(a).

§ 106-544.
Shipments from out of State.

All baby chicks, turkey poults and hatching eggs shipped or otherwise brought into this State shall originate in flocks that meet the minimum requirements of pullorum and typhoid disease control provided for in this Article and the regulations issued by authority of this Article, and shall be accompanied by a certificate approved by the official state agency or the livestock sanitary officials of the state of origin certifying same.

History.

1945, c. 616, s. 6; 1969, c. 464.

§ 106-545.
False advertising.

No hatchery, hatchery dealer, chick dealer or jobber shall use false or misleading advertising in the sale of their products.

History.

1945, c. 616, s. 7; 1969, c. 464.

§ 106-546.
Notice describing grade of chicks to be posted.

All hatcheries, chick dealers or jobbers offering chicks for sale to the public shall post in a conspicuous manner in their place of business a poster furnished by the North Carolina Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services describing the grade of chicks approved by the North Carolina Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.

History.

1945, c. 616, s. 8; 1969, c. 464; 1997-261, s. 109.

§ 106-547.
Records to be kept.

Every hatchery, hatching egg dealer, chick dealer, poultry dealer, ratite dealer, or jobber shall keep such records of operation as the regulations of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services may require for the proper inspection of said hatchery, dealer, or jobber.

History.

1945, c. 616, s. 9; 1969, c. 464; 1997-261, s. 109; 1998-212, s. 13.10(d).

§ 106-548.
Quarantine.

When the State Veterinarian receives information or has reason to believe that pullorum disease or fowl typhoid exists in any poultry or that they have been exposed to one of these diseases, he shall promptly cause said poultry to be quarantined on the premises where located. Said poultry or hatching eggs shall not be removed from the premises where quarantined until quarantine has been released by the State Veterinarian or his authorized representative. A permit to move such infected or exposed poultry to immediate slaughter, or to another premise under quarantine, may be issued by the State Veterinarian or his authorized representative.

History.

1945, c. 616, s. 10; 1969, c. 464; 1983, c. 290, s. 6.

§ 106-549.
Violation a misdemeanor.

Any person, firm or corporation who shall willfully violate any provision of this Article or any rule or regulation duly established by authority of this Article, shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.

History.

1945, c. 616, s. 11; 1969, c. 464; 1993, c. 539, s. 798; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 106-549.01.
Civil penalties.

The Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services may assess a civil penalty of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) against any person who violates a provision of this Article or any rule promulgated thereunder. In determining the amount of the penalty, the Department shall consider the degree and extent of harm caused by the violation.

The clear proceeds of civil penalties assessed pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

History.

1995, c. 516, s. 12; 1997-261, s. 57; 1998-215, s. 16.